Tennessee statutes. Title 65 Public Utilities and Carriers
Chapter 25 Rural Electric and Community Services Cooperatives
65-25-119. Effect of consolidation or merger.

The effect of consolidation or merger shall be as follows:

The several cooperatives which are parties to the consolidation or merger shall be a single cooperative, which, in the case of a consolidation, shall be the new cooperative provided for in the articles of consolidation, and, in the case of a merger, shall be that cooperative designated in the articles of merger as the surviving cooperative, and the separate existence of all such cooperatives, except the new or surviving cooperative, shall cease;

Such new or surviving cooperatives shall have all the rights, privileges, immunities, and powers and shall be subject to all the duties and liabilities of a cooperative organized under this chapter, and shall possess all the rights, privileges, immunities and franchises, as well of a public as of a private nature, and all property, real and personal, applications for membership, all debts due on whatever account, and all other choses in action, of each of the consolidating or merging cooperatives. Furthermore, all and every interest of, or belonging or due to, each of the cooperatives so consolidated or merged shall be taken and deemed to be transferred to and vested in such new or surviving cooperative without further act or deed; and the title to any real estate, or any interest therein, under the laws of this state, vested in any such cooperatives shall not revert or be in any way impaired by such consolidation or merger;

Such new or surviving cooperative shall thenceforth be responsible and liable for all of the liabilities and obligations of each of the cooperatives so consolidated or merged, and any claim existing, or action or proceeding pending, by or against any of such cooperatives, may be prosecuted as if such consolidation or merger had not taken place, but such new or surviving cooperative may be substituted in its place;

Neither the rights of creditors nor any liens upon the property of any such cooperatives shall be impaired by such consolidation or merger; and

In the case of a consolidation, the articles of consolidation shall be deemed to be the articles of incorporation of the new cooperatives; and in the case of a merger, the articles of incorporation of the surviving cooperative shall be deemed to be amended to the extent, if any, that changes in the articles of incorporation of the surviving cooperative are provided for in the articles of merger.

Acts 1988, ch. 689, § 2; T.C.A. § 65-25-219.

Code Commission Notes.

Former part 1 of this chapter was deleted and former part 2 was renumbered as T.C.A. §§ 65-25-101 to 65-25-135 by authority of the Code Commission in 2015.

65-25-120. Dissolution.

A cooperative which has not commenced business may dissolve voluntarily by delivering to the secretary of state articles of dissolution, executed and acknowledged on behalf of the cooperative by a majority of the incorporators, which shall state:

The name of the cooperative;

The address of its principal office;

That the cooperative has not commenced business;

That the amount, if any, actually paid in on account of membership fees, less any part thereof disbursed for necessary expenses, has been returned to those entitled thereto and that all easements shall have been released to the grantors;

That no debt of the cooperative remains unpaid; and

That a majority of the incorporators elect that the cooperative be dissolved.

Such articles of dissolution shall be submitted to the secretary of state for filing as provided in this chapter.

A cooperative which has commenced business may dissolve voluntarily and wind up its affairs in the following manner: Except as provided in § 65-25-113(a)(2)(D), the board shall first recommend that the cooperative be dissolved, which recommendation shall be submitted to the members of the cooperative at any annual or special meeting, the notice of which shall set forth such proposition. The proposed voluntary dissolution shall be deemed to be approved upon the affirmative votes of:

If dissolution is or will be an incident of the sale, lease-sale or other disposition of the assets and properties of the cooperative, as many as but not fewer than the percentage of the cooperative's members required to authorize such sale, lease-sale or other disposition as provided in § 65-25-113(a)(1)(A)(i), (ii), (iii), (iv), (v) or (vi), or § 65-25-113(b), or (c), or § 65-25-114(a), (b) or (c), whichever is applicable; or

If dissolution is or will be from any other cause, the number or percentage of its members, or of those voting, whichever may be the case, as provided in the cooperative's articles of incorporation or bylaws.

Any assets remaining after the discharge or provision for the discharge of all of the cooperative's liabilities and the distribution of any patronage capital still outstanding on its books shall be distributed on a pro rata basis and without priority to all present and former members of the cooperative to the extent practicable, as determined by the board; provided, that if the board determines that the amount of such surplus is so small in relation to the administrative cost of distributing it as to be prohibited, such surplus may be donated by the board to one (1) or more charitable or educational organizations which are exempt from federal income taxation.

Acts 1988, ch. 689, § 2; T.C.A.§ 65-25-220.

Code Commission Notes.

Former part 1 of this chapter was deleted and former part 2 was renumbered as T.C.A. §§ 65-25-101 to 65-25-135 by authority of the Code Commission in 2015.

65-25-121. Foreign corporations.

Any corporation organized on a nonprofit or a cooperative basis for the primary purpose and/or for one (1) or more secondary purposes and operating in a state adjacent to this state shall be permitted to transact business in this state without complying with any statute of this state pertaining to the qualification of foreign corporations for the transaction of business in this state.

Any such foreign corporation, as a prerequisite to its transaction of business in this state, shall, by an instrument executed and acknowledged in its behalf by its president or vice president and attested to by its secretary, designate the secretary of state its agent to accept service of process in its behalf. In the event any such process shall be served upon the secretary of state, the secretary of state shall forthwith forward the same by registered mail to such corporation at the address thereof specified in such instrument.

Any such corporation may sue and be sued in the courts of this state to the same extent that a cooperative under this chapter may sue or be sued in such courts.

Any such foreign corporation may secure its notes, bonds, or other evidences of indebtedness by mortgage, pledge, deed of trust, or other encumbrance of any or all of its then-owned or after-acquired real or personal property, assets, or franchise, located or to be located in this state, and also upon its revenues and income.

Acts 1988, ch. 689, § 2; T.C.A. § 65-25-221.

Code Commission Notes.

Former part 1 of this chapter was deleted and former part 2 was renumbered as T.C.A. §§ 65-25-101 to 65-25-135 by authority of the Code Commission in 2015.

Cross-References. Certified mail instead of registered mail, § 1-3-111.

65-25-122. Taxes.

Nothing in this chapter shall exempt cooperatives and foreign corporations transacting business in this state pursuant to this chapter from ad valorem property taxes. Assessment schedules for such property that is devoted to and used or useful in pursuance of the primary purpose shall be filed with the comptroller of the treasury, and the payment of such taxes shall be in lieu of all other taxes of every kind or nature whatever, unless it is otherwise specifically provided by law that such other tax or taxes shall be applicable to cooperatives formed or foreign corporations transacting business pursuant to this chapter.

Assessment schedules for such property that is devoted and used or useful in pursuance of one (1) or more secondary purposes shall be filed in the same manner and in the same places, and taxes on such properties shall be paid to the same authorities and to the same extent, as would be the case were such cooperative or foreign corporation organized and operating as a corporation under the Tennessee Business Corporation Act, compiled in title 48, chapters 11-27.

Acts 1988, ch. 689, § 2; 1995, ch. 305, § 34; T.C.A. § 65-25-222; Acts 2016, ch. 937, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

Former part 1 of this chapter was deleted and former part 2 was renumbered as T.C.A. §§ 65-25-101 to 65-25-135 by authority of the Code Commission in 2015.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2016, ch. 937, § 4 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall apply to tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2016.

Amendments. The 2016 amendment, in (a), substituted “shall exempt” for “shall be construed to exempt” in the first sentence, and deleted the former proviso at the end of the second sentence which read: “; provided, that all facilities and plants constructed for such primary purpose shall be exempt from ad valorem property taxes for a period of four (4) years from and after the date of such construction”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 937, § 4. April 27, 2016.

Attorney General Opinions. The tax exemption for rural electric cooperatives contained in T.C.A. § 65-25-122(a) is unconstitutional because it purports to grant a tax exemption that is not authorized by Tenn. Const. Article II, Section 28. OAG 15-71, 2015 Tenn. AG LEXIS 72 (10/21/2015).

65-25-123. Exemption from jurisdiction of Tennessee public utility commission.

Cooperatives and foreign corporations transacting business in this state pursuant to this chapter shall be deemed to be not-for-profit cooperatives and nonutilities, and, except as provided in § 65-25-122, exempt in all respects from the jurisdiction and control of the Tennessee public utility commission.

Acts 1988, ch. 689, § 2; 1995, ch. 305, § 35; T.C.A. § 65-25-223; Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 57.

Code Commission Notes.

Former part 1 of this chapter was deleted and former part 2 was renumbered as T.C.A. §§ 65-25-101 to 65-25-135 by authority of the Code Commission in 2015.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “Tennessee public utility commission” for “Tennessee regulatory authority”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 83. April 4, 2017.

65-25-124. Securities act exemption.

Title 48, chapter 16 shall not apply to any note, bond, or other evidence of indebtedness issued by any cooperative or foreign corporation transacting business in this state pursuant to this chapter, to the United States or any agency or instrumentality thereof, or to any mortgage or deed of trust executed to secure the same. These sections, as amended, shall not apply to the issuance of membership certificates by any cooperative or any such foreign corporation.

Acts 1988, ch. 689, § 2; T.C.A. § 65-25-224.

Code Commission Notes.

Former part 1 of this chapter was deleted and former part 2 was renumbered as T.C.A. §§ 65-25-101 to 65-25-135 by authority of the Code Commission in 2015.

65-25-125. Nonapplicability or qualified applicability of certain provisions of the Tennessee Nonprofit Corporation Act.

The following sections of the Tennessee Nonprofit Corporation Act, all contained in title 48, shall not be applicable to cooperatives incorporated under or otherwise subject to this chapter: §§ 48-56-103, 48-56-204, title 48, chapter 56, part 3 and § 48-56-501; §§ 48-57-102 — 48-57-105, 48-57-108, 48-57-201, 48-57-203 — 48-57-209 and 48-57-301; §§ 48-58-103 — 48-58-106, 48-58-108, and 48-58-109 and 48-58-304 [repealed]; §§ 48-60-103, 48-60-202 — 48-60-204 and 48-60-302; title 48, chapter 61; §§ 48-62-101 and 48-62-103; §§ 48-63-101 and 48-63-102; and § 48-64-102.

The following provisions of the Tennessee Nonprofit Corporation Act, all contained in title 48, shall, but only as qualified in this subsection (b), be applicable to cooperatives incorporated under or otherwise subject to this chapter:

Section 48-51-201 except as provided in subdivisions (13) and (31) and in the second sentence of subdivision (15) thereof; § 48-51-202 except that subsection (c) thereof shall apply also to notice to directors of board meetings; § 48-51-601 except that the words “impractical or” in subsection (a) thereof shall not be in effect;

Section 48-52-101 except that incorporators under this chapter may be one (1) or more cooperatives;

Title 48, chapter 55 shall apply to cooperatives, except that, with respect to cooperatives already in existence prior to January 1, 1988:

Unless and until thereafter changed, their registered offices and addresses shall be their principal offices and addresses and their registered agents shall be their general or acting managers, by whatever title known, and such agents' addresses shall be that of the registered offices; and

Such cooperatives need not file any statement of their registered offices or agents or of the addresses of such offices or agents until they otherwise are required to file an amendment of their respective charters pursuant to § 48-68-101(b); provided, if such registered offices or agents or their addresses are changed after January 1, 1988, such cooperatives shall file a statement thereof with the secretary of state pursuant to § 48-68-102;

Section 48-58-303 except that a cooperative may make loans to guarantee the obligations of a director, or of an officer who is also a member of the cooperative, in the ordinary course of business for the same purposes, on the same basis, and the same manner and to the same extent as such loans may be made to, or obligation may be guaranteed on behalf of, other members of the cooperative;

Subsection (a), but not subsection (b), of § 48-60-101 shall be applicable; and

Section 48-66-108 except that the entitlement in the section shall not be greater than the entitlement provided in § 48-66-102.

The provisions of nonapplicability and of qualified applicability set forth in subsections (a) and (b) shall not be exclusive. Other provisions of the Tennessee Nonprofit Corporation Act, compiled in title 48, chapters 51-68, shall or shall not be applicable, wholly or on a qualified or partial basis, to cooperatives incorporated under or otherwise subject to this chapter, depending upon whether such provisions are or are not consistent with or different from the provisions of this chapter, as provided for in § 48-51-104.

Acts 1988, ch. 689, § 2; 2014, ch. 884, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A. § 65-25-225.

Code Commission Notes.

Former part 1 of this chapter was deleted and former part 2 was renumbered as T.C.A. §§ 65-25-101 to 65-25-135 by authority of the Code Commission in 2015.

Compiler's Notes. Section 48-58-304 referred to in (a) was repealed by Acts 2014, ch. 899, § 41, effective January 1, 2015. For current similar provisions, see § 48-58-302.

Amendments. The 2014 amendment, effective January 1, 2015, in (a), substituted “48-57-203 — 48-57-209” for “48-57-203 — 48-57-208” and substituted “48-62-103” for “48-62-102”; and added (b)(6).

Effective Dates. Acts 2014, ch. 884, § 4. January 1, 2015.

Cross-References. Tennessee Nonprofit Corporation Act, title 48, chs. 51-68.

65-25-126. Construction of chapter.

This chapter shall be construed liberally. The enumeration of any object, purpose, power, manner, method, or thing shall not be deemed to exclude like or similar objects, purposes, powers, manner, methods, or things. Notwithstanding the foregoing or any other provisions in this chapter to the contrary, this chapter shall not be construed to affect the powers conferred or the limitations imposed upon annexing municipalities and electric cooperatives in § 6-51-112; nor shall this chapter be construed to affect or restrict the services or activities provided or performed by a microwave system authorized and licensed by the federal communications commission on April 7, 1988.

Acts 1988, ch. 689, § 2; T.C.A. § 65-25-226.

Code Commission Notes.

Former part 1 of this chapter was deleted and former part 2 was renumbered as T.C.A. §§ 65-25-101 to 65-25-135 by authority of the Code Commission in 2015.

65-25-127. [Repealed.]

Acts 1988, ch. 689, § 2; 1999, ch. 430, § 6; T.C.A. § 65-25-227; repealed by Acts 2017, ch. 228, § 9, effective April 24, 2017.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 65-25-127 concerned the sale of cable programming.

65-25-128. [Repealed.]

Acts 1988, ch. 689, § 2; 1992, ch. 714, § 1; T.C.A. § 65-25-228; repealed by Acts 2019, ch. 174, § 1, effective April 23, 2019.

Code Commission Notes.

Former part 1 of this chapter was deleted and former part 2 was renumbered as T.C.A. §§ 65-25-101 to 65-25-135 by authority of the Code Commission in 2015.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 65-25-128 concerned existing electric cooperatives and restrictions on concurrent operation with microwave systems.

65-25-129. Exemption for utility districts.

Notwithstanding any provision contained in this chapter to the contrary, it is the specific intent of this chapter that all utility districts heretofore or hereafter created under the “Utility District Act of 1937,” compiled in title 7, chapter 82, or any similar legislation, shall be specifically exempt from this chapter.

Acts 1988, ch. 689, § 3; T.C.A. § 65-25-229.

Code Commission Notes.

Former part 1 of this chapter was deleted and former part 2 was renumbered as T.C.A. §§ 65-25-101 to 65-25-135 by authority of the Code Commission in 2015.

65-25-130. Subsidies by electric cooperatives to cable joint ventures — Antitrust provisions — Remedies.

An electric cooperative may not provide subsidies to a cable joint venture. Notwithstanding that limitation, an electric cooperative participating in a cable joint venture may:

Dedicate a reasonable portion of the electric plant to the provision of such service, the costs of which shall be allocated to such services by agreement of the parties to the joint venture; and

Lend funds, at a rate of interest not less than the highest rate then earned by the electric cooperative on invested electric plant funds, to acquire, construct, and provide working capital for the system, plant, and equipment necessary to provide any such services; provided, that such interest costs shall be allocated to the cost of such service for regulatory purposes, and further provided that no financing for a cable joint venture shall come from loans from the rural utility service of the United States department of agriculture unless and until such loans are specifically authorized by federal statute.

To the extent that an electric cooperative offers services through a cable joint venture, such cooperative shall have all the powers, obligations, and authority granted other entities providing such services under the applicable laws of the United States, the state of Tennessee, or local governments; provided, that the franchise under which the joint venture shall operate shall in no way be considered an overlapping franchise nor in any way modify or amend § 7-59-203.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to alter or amend the process or procedure for renewal of franchises.

It is unlawful during the negotiation of the joint venture or thereafter for any party to a cable joint venture or the local franchising authority, as defined in title 7, chapter 59, to use unfair or anti-competitive practices under any applicable state or federal law. Such practices shall include, but are not limited to, predatory pricing, collusion, and price tying.

The parties to a cable joint venture or the local franchising authority, as defined in title 7, chapter 59, may bring a civil action for injunctive or declaratory relief in chancery court to enforce subsection (d). Venue for such action may be in any county where the unfair or anti-competitive practice is alleged to have occurred or to be threatened.

If the cable joint venture or any member of the cable joint venture providing such service is exempt from paying federal, state, or local taxes, then, for regulatory purposes, the cable joint venture shall allocate to the costs of such services an amount equal to a reasonable determination of the state, local and federal taxes which would be required to be paid if the cable joint venture were not exempt and each of its members were not exempt from paying such taxes.

Acts 1999, ch. 430, § 2; T.C.A. § 65-25-230; Acts 2017, ch. 228, § 10.

Code Commission Notes.

Former part 1 of this chapter was deleted and former part 2 was renumbered as T.C.A. §§ 65-25-101 to 65-25-135 by authority of the Code Commission in 2015.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1999, ch. 430, § 9 provided that that act supersedes any conflicting general law, charter or metropolitan charter provisions.

Acts 2017, ch. 228, § 1 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall be known and may be cited as the “Tennessee Broadband Accessibility Act.”

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “services through a cable joint venture” for “ the services authorized by § 65-25-105 in a joint venture” in (b).

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 228, § 16. April 24, 2017.

65-25-131. Joint ventures for provision of telephone, telegraph or telecommunications services — Subsidies — Antitrust provisions — Remedies — Joint ventures for provision of natural gas.

Each cooperative may, within its service area and with the authorization of its board, contract to establish a telecommunications joint venture with any entity for the provision of telephone, telegraph, or telecommunications services in compliance with chapters 4 and 5 of this title, and all other applicable state and federal laws, rules and regulations. Notwithstanding § 65-4-101(6)(B) or any other provision of this code or of any private act, a telecommunication joint venture and every member of a telecommunication joint venture shall be subject to regulation by the Tennessee public utility commission in the same manner and to the same extent as other certified providers of telecommunications services, including, without limitation, rules or orders governing anti-competitive practices, and shall be considered as and have the duties of a public utility, as defined in § 65-4-101, but only to the extent necessary to effect such regulation and only with respect to the provision of telephone, telegraph and telecommunication services.

Neither an electric cooperative nor any other entity participating in a telecommunications joint venture that provides such services may provide subsidies for such services. Notwithstanding the limitations set forth in the preceding sentence, an electric cooperative participating in a telecommunications joint venture may:

Dedicate a reasonable portion of the electric plant to the provision of such services, the costs of which shall be allocated to such services for regulatory purposes; and

Lend funds, at a rate of interest not less than the highest rate then earned by the electric cooperative on invested electric plant funds, to acquire, construct, and provide working capital for the system, plant, and equipment necessary to provide any such services; provided, that such interest costs shall be allocated to the cost of such services for regulatory purposes.

To the extent that it provides such services, a telecommunications joint venture has all the powers, obligations and authority granted entities providing telecommunications services under applicable laws of the United States or this state. To the extent that such authority and powers do not conflict with chapter 4 or 5 of this title, and any rules, regulations, or orders issued thereunder, a telecommunications joint venture providing any such services shall have all the authority and powers with respect to such services as are enumerated in this chapter.

If the telecommunications joint venture or any member of the telecommunications joint venture providing such service is exempt from paying federal, state, or local taxes, then for regulatory purposes, the telecommunications joint venture shall allocate to the costs of such services an amount equal to a reasonable determination of the state, local and federal taxes which would be required to be paid if the telecommunications joint venture and each of its members were not exempt from paying such taxes.

This subsection (a) is not applicable to areas served by an incumbent local exchange telephone company or telephone cooperative with fewer than one hundred thousand (100,000) total access lines in this state unless such company voluntarily enters into an interconnection agreement with a competing telecommunications service provider or unless such incumbent local exchange telephone company applies for a certificate to provide telecommunications services in an area outside its service area existing on June 6, 1995, or § 65-4-201(d), is declared unconstitutional or unlawful by a court of competent jurisdiction in a final non-appealable order.

Each cooperative may, within its service area and with the authorization of its board, contract to establish a joint venture with any entity to provide the transmission, transportation, distribution, delivery, or sale of natural gas, or similar products; provided, that the entity with which the joint venture is established shall be engaged in such business at the time the contract to establish the joint venture is effective.

Acts 1999, ch. 430, § 4; T.C.A. § 65-25-231; Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 58.

Code Commission Notes.

Former part 1 of this chapter was deleted and former part 2 was renumbered as T.C.A. §§ 65-25-101 to 65-25-135 by authority of the Code Commission in 2015.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1999, ch. 430, § 9 provided that that act supersedes any conflicting general law, charter or metropolitan charter provisions.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “Tennessee public utility commission” for “Tennessee regulatory authority” in (a)(1).

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 83. April 4, 2017.

65-25-132. Joint ventures subject to excise and franchise taxes.

Each joint venture created pursuant to § 65-25-105 or § 65-25-131 in which one (1) or more of the owners of the joint venture is an entity subject to the taxes imposed by title 67, chapter 4, parts 20 and 21 shall itself be subject to and shall pay the taxes required by title 67, chapter 4, parts 20 and 21, or any tax imposed in place thereof.

Acts 1999, ch. 430, § 7; T.C.A. § 65-25-232.

Code Commission Notes.

Former part 1 of this chapter was deleted and former part 2 was renumbered as T.C.A. §§ 65-25-101 to 65-25-135 by authority of the Code Commission in 2015.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1999, ch. 430, § 9 provided that that act supersedes any conflicting general law, charter or metropolitan charter provisions.

65-25-133. Joint ventures to provide alarm services not authorized.

Nothing in Acts 1999, ch. 430, shall be construed to allow an electric cooperative or a joint venture in which an electric cooperative is a member to engage in the business of providing alarm systems, as defined in title 62, chapter 32, part 3.

Acts 1999, ch. 430, § 8; T.C.A. § 65-25-233.

Code Commission Notes.

Former part 1 of this chapter was deleted and former part 2 was renumbered as T.C.A. §§ 65-25-101 to 65-25-135 by authority of the Code Commission in 2015.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1999, ch. 430, § 9 provided that that act supersedes any conflicting general law, charter or metropolitan charter provisions.

Acts 1999, ch. 430, referred to in this section, enacted or amended numerous sections throughout this chapter. See the Table of Sections Affected in Volume 13.

65-25-134. Telecommunications services.

Notwithstanding § 7-59-316, every cooperative has the power and is authorized, acting through its board of directors, to acquire, construct, own, improve, operate, lease, maintain, sell, mortgage, pledge, or otherwise dispose of any system, plant or equipment for the provision of telephone, telegraph, voice over internet protocol, telecommunications services, or any other like system, plant, or equipment within or without the service area of the cooperative in compliance with chapters 4 and 5 of this title and all other applicable state and federal laws, rules, and regulations. Notwithstanding § 65-4-101(6)(A)(vi) or any other provision of this code or of any private act to the contrary, to the extent that any cooperative provides any of the services authorized by this subdivision (a)(1), the cooperative shall be subject to regulation by the Tennessee public utility commission in the same manner and to the same extent as other certificated providers of the services authorized by this subsection (a), including, without limitation, rules or orders governing anti-competitive practices, and shall be considered as and have the duties of a public utility, as defined in § 65-4-101, but only to the extent necessary to effect such regulation and only with respect to the cooperative's provision of the services authorized by this subdivision (a)(1).

Every cooperative has the power and is authorized, acting through its board of directors, to acquire, construct, own, improve, operate, lease, maintain, sell, mortgage, pledge, or otherwise dispose of any system, plant or equipment for the provision of broadband internet access, internet protocol-based video, video programming, or related or similar services, or any other like system, plant, or equipment within the service area of the cooperative in compliance with chapters 4 and 5 of this title and all other applicable state and federal laws, rules, and regulations, including, but not limited to, the requirement to obtain a franchise as set forth in § 7-59-304. Notwithstanding § 65-4-101(6)(A)(vi) or any other provision of this code or of any private act to the contrary, to the extent that any cooperative provides any of the services authorized by this subdivision (a)(2), the cooperative shall furnish the services on an area coverage basis, as defined in § 65-25-102, and shall be subject to regulation by the Tennessee public utility commission in the same manner and to the same extent as other providers of broadband internet access, internet protocol-based video, video programming, or related or similar services, including, without limitation, rules or orders governing anti-competitive practices, and shall be considered as and have the duties of a public utility, as defined in § 65-4-101, but only to the extent necessary to effect such regulation and only with respect to the cooperative's provision of the services authorized by this subdivision (a)(2). In the event that a cooperative acquires, merges with, or consolidates with another entity that provides any one (1) of the services authorized by this subdivision (a)(2) in a geographic location concurrent with or adjacent to the electric service area of the cooperative, then, subsequent to such transaction, nothing in this section prohibits the electric cooperative from providing the services authorized by this subdivision (a)(2) in the geographic service territory in which the acquired or merged entity was authorized to provide such services prior to the merger, acquisition, or consolidation.

A cooperative that elects to provide services authorized by subdivision (a)(2) shall provide other providers of such services non-discriminatory access to locate their equipment for the provision of such services on infrastructure or poles owned or controlled by the cooperative, subject to the terms of any pole attachment agreements between the cooperative and the other provider, the American National Standard Electric Safety Code described in § 68-101-104, and the structural integrity of the infrastructure or pole.

A cooperative providing any of the services authorized by subsection (a) shall not provide subsidies for such services and shall administer, operate, and maintain the electric system separately in all respects, including establishing and maintaining a separate fund for the revenues from electric operations, and shall not directly or indirectly mingle electric system funds or accounts, or otherwise consolidate or combine the financing of the electric system, with those of any other of its operations.

A cooperative providing any of the services authorized by subdivision (a)(2) shall administer and operate such services as a separate subsidiary.

Notwithstanding the limitations set out in this subsection (b), a cooperative providing the services authorized by subsection (a) is authorized to:

Dedicate a reasonable portion of the electric plant to the provision of such services, the costs of which shall be allocated to such services in the separate accounting required under this subsection (b); and

Lend funds, at a rate of interest not less than the highest rate then earned by the cooperative on invested electric plant funds, to acquire, construct, and provide working capital for the system, plant, and equipment necessary to provide any of the services authorized under subsection (a); provided, that such interest costs shall be allocated to the cost of such services in the separate accounting required under this subsection (b).

To the extent that it provides any of the services authorized by subsection (a), a cooperative has all the powers, obligations and authority granted entities providing telecommunications services under applicable laws of the United States or this state. To the extent that such authority and powers do not conflict with title 65, chapter 4 or 5, and any rules, regulations, or orders issued thereunder, a cooperative providing any of the services authorized by subsection (a) has all the authority and powers with respect to such services as are enumerated in this chapter.

Notwithstanding the authorization granted in subsection (a), a cooperative shall not provide any of the services authorized by subsection (a) unrelated to its electric services within the service area of an entity in existence and operating as a telephone cooperative on April 24, 2017, with fewer than one hundred thousand (100,000) total lines organized and operating under chapter 29 of this title, and therefore shall adhere to those regulations of the 1995 Tennessee Telecommunications Act and rules of the Tennessee public utility commission, which are applicable to the telephone cooperatives, and specifically §§ 65-4-101 and 65-29-130.

For regulatory purposes, a cooperative shall allocate to the costs of providing any of the services authorized by subsection (a):

An amount for attachments to poles owned by the cooperative equal to the highest rate charged by the cooperative to any other person or entity for comparable pole attachments; and

Any applicable rights-of-way fees, rentals, charges, or payments required by state or local law of a non-governmental corporation that provides the identical services.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to allow a cooperative to provide any service for which a license, certification, or registration is required under title 62, chapter 32, part 3.

Nothing in this chapter shall allow a cooperative to provide any service for which a license, certification, or registration is required under title 62, chapter 32, part 3, or to provide pager service.

This chapter supersedes any conflicting law.

It is unlawful for a cooperative to use unfair or anticompetitive practices prohibited by applicable state or federal law. Such practices shall include, but are not limited to, predatory pricing, collusion, and tying.

Any person who has been damaged as a result of a violation of this section may bring a civil action in chancery court for injunctive or declaratory relief against the violation.

Acts 2000, ch. 665, § 1; T.C.A. § 65-25-234; 2017, ch. 94, § 59; Acts 2017, ch. 228, §§ 11-14; 2019, ch. 174, § 2.

Code Commission Notes.

Former part 1 of this chapter was deleted and former part 2 was renumbered as T.C.A. §§ 65-25-101 to 65-25-135 by authority of the Code Commission in 2015.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1999, ch. 430, referred to in (e)(2), amended §§ 65-25-102, 65-25-104, 65-25-105, and 65-25-127, and enacted §§ 65-25-130 and 65-25-133.

Acts 2017, ch. 228, § 1 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall be known and may be cited as the “Tennessee Broadband Accessibility Act.”

Amendments. The 2017 amendment by ch. 94 substituted “Tennessee public utility commission” for “Tennessee regulatory authority” in (a)(2) and (c)(2).

The 2017 amendment by ch. 228 rewrote (a) and (b) which read: “(a) Every cooperative has the power and is authorized, acting through its board of directors, to acquire, construct, own, improve, operate, lease, maintain, sell, mortgage, pledge or otherwise dispose of any system, plant or equipment for the provision of telephone, telegraph, telecommunications services, or any other like system, plant, or equipment within and/or without the service area of such cooperative in compliance with title 65, chapters 4 and 5, and all other applicable state and federal laws, rules and regulations. Notwithstanding § 65-4-101(6)(A)(vi) or any other provision of this code or of any private act to the contrary, to the extent that any cooperative provides any of the services authorized by this section, such cooperative shall be subject to regulation by the Tennessee regulatory authority in the same manner and to the same extent as other certificated providers of telecommunications services, including, without limitation, rules or orders governing anti-competitive practices, and shall be considered as and have the duties of a public utility, as defined in § 65-4-101, but only to the extent necessary to effect such regulation and only with respect to such cooperative's provision of telephone, telegraph and communication services.“(b) A cooperative providing any of the services authorized by subsection (a) shall not provide subsidies for such services. Notwithstanding that limitation, a cooperative providing such services shall be authorized to:“(1) Dedicate a reasonable portion of the electric plant to the provision of such services, the costs of which shall be allocated to such services for regulatory purposes;“(2) Lend funds, at a rate of interest not less than the highest rate then earned by the cooperative on invested electric plant funds, to acquire, construct, and provide working capital for the system, plant, and equipment necessary to provide any of the services authorized under subsection (a); provided, that such interest costs shall be allocated to the cost of such services for regulatory purposes.”; deleted “or to operate a cable system as defined by § 7-59-201, except as permitted by Acts 1999, ch. 430,” preceding “or to provide pager service” at the end of (e)(2); and added (g) and (h).

The 2019 amendment, substituted “an entity in existence and operating as a telephone cooperative on April 24, 2017” for “an existing telephone cooperative” near the beginning of (c)(2).

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 83. April 4, 2017.

Acts 2017, ch. 228, § 16. April 24, 2017.

Acts 2019, ch. 174, § 3. April 23, 2019.